Utah statutes.
78B-5-411.   Enforcement of foreign judgments.

(1)  Subject to Subsections (2) and (3), if an action is brought to enforce a judgment of another jurisdiction expressed in a foreign money and the judgment is recognized in this state as enforceable, the enforcing judgment shall be entered as provided in Section 78B-5-408 whether or not the foreign judgment confers an option to pay in an equivalent amount of United States dollars.  A satisfaction or partial payment made upon the foreign judgment, on proof thereof, shall be credited against the amount of foreign money specified in the judgment, notwithstanding the entry of judgment in this state.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a foreign judgment may be filed in the judgment docket in accordance with any statute of this state providing a procedure for its recognition and enforcement.

(3)  A judgment entered on a foreign-money claim only in United States dollars in another state shall be enforced in this state in United States dollars only.

